Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,130
Registration award.

A teacher who applies to a credentialing organization for credentials required for master teacher status shall be eligible for a registration award to pay for application and registration fees associated with obtaining the credentials. To receive a partial registration award in the amount of one-half of the associated fees, the teacher shall register with the State Department of Education within one year of application to the credentialing organization by submitting any documentation required by rule and regulation. To receive a final registration award in the amount of the remaining fees, the teacher shall notify the department that the teacher received the credentials and shall submit any documentation required by rule and regulation. Up to forty eligible teachers shall receive the first half of a registration award each year.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 13.